Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB617.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 312.165 is amended to read as follows:
The board may, at any time after the refusal or revocation of a license, for good and
sufficient reason appearing to it, issue a license to the person affected, conferring upon
him or her all the rights and privileges of and pertaining to the practice of chiropractic, as
defined and regulated by this chapter.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/16/2025 1:16 PM Jacketed